Hawaii statutes.
§286-108 Examination of applicants. (a)
Except as provided in section 286-107.5(a), the examiner of drivers shall
examine every applicant for a driver's license, except as otherwise provided in
this part. The examination shall include a test of:

(1) The applicant's eyesight and any further physical
examination that the examiner of drivers finds necessary to determine the
applicant's fitness to operate a motor vehicle safely upon the highways;

(2) The applicant's ability to understand highway
signs regulating, warning, and directing traffic;

(3) The applicant's knowledge of the rules of the
road based on the traffic laws of the State and the traffic ordinances of the
county where the applicant resides or intends to operate a motor vehicle; provided
that the examination shall specifically test the applicant's knowledge of the
provisions of section 291C-121.5 and section 291C-137; and

(4) The actual demonstration of ability to exercise
ordinary and reasonable control in the operation of a motor vehicle.

The examinations shall be appropriate to the
operation of the category of motor vehicle for which the applicant seeks to be
licensed and shall be conducted as required by the director.

The examiner of drivers shall require every
applicant to comply with section 286-102.5.

The examiner of drivers may waive the actual
demonstration of ability to operate a motorcycle or motor scooter for any
person who furnishes evidence, to the satisfaction of the examiner of drivers,
that the person has completed the motorcycle education course approved by the
director in accordance with section 431:10G-104.

At the time of examination, an application for
voter registration by mail shall be made available to every applicant for a
driver's license.

For the purposes of this section, the term "applicant"
does not include any person reactivating a license under section 286‑107.5(a).

(b) The examiner of drivers shall require
proof from every applicant under the age of eighteen that the applicant has
completed a driver education program and a behind-the-wheel driver training
course certified by the director of transportation. The examiner of drivers
shall not examine any applicant for a provisional license who is sixteen
through seventeen years of age unless the applicant holds and has held a valid
instruction permit under section 286-110, for a period of no fewer than one
hundred eighty days. If the applicant's instruction permit has expired and a
new instruction permit was issued within thirty days of its expiration, the examiner
of drivers may examine the applicant without requiring an additional one
hundred eighty day period.

(c) The examiner of drivers may waive the
written or oral examination required under subsection (a)(2) and (3) and the
actual demonstration of ability to operate a motor vehicle for any person who:

(1) Is at least eighteen years of age and who
possesses a valid driver's license issued to the applicant in any other state
of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto
Rico, American Samoa, Guam, a province of the Dominion of Canada, or the
Commonwealth of the Northern Mariana Islands for the operation of vehicles in
categories 1 through 3 of section 286-102;

(2) Has completed the same requirements as set forth
in section 286‑102.6(f) in another state and possesses a valid
provisional license from that state; or

(3) Is at least eighteen years of age and who
possesses a valid driver's license issued to the applicant in any jurisdiction
for which the director has granted reciprocal licensing privileges in
accordance with section 286-101.5 for the operation of vehicles in category (3)
of section 286-102(b).

(d) As part of the examination required by
this section, the applicant for a driver's license shall produce and display a
valid motor vehicle or liability insurance identification card for the motor
vehicle required by sections 431:10C-107 and 431:10G-106, when the applicant
demonstrates the ability to operate a motor vehicle to the satisfaction of the
examiner of drivers. If no valid motor vehicle or liability insurance
identification card is displayed, the examiner of drivers shall not issue a
driver's license to the applicant. [L 1937, c 234, §11; RL 1945, §7312; RL
1955, §160-42; am L 1967, c 214, §9; HRS §286-108; am L 1975, c 194, §3; am L
Sp 1977 1st, c 20, §12; am L 1978, c 91, §11; am L 1985, c 26, §1; am L 1986, c
224, §1; am L 1990, c 45, §10; am L 1991, c 60, §1; am L 1997, c 104, §1, c
251, §7, c 269, §1, and c 330, §5; am L 1999, c 175, §§2, 15; am L 2001, c 86,
§5; am L 2002, c 4, §1; am L 2005, c 72, §§5, 15; am L 2008, c 170, §§3, 7; am
L 2010, c 85, §2; am L 2013, c 74, §3; am L 2014, c 40, §1; am L 2015, c 131,
§4; am L 2016, c 15, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next